District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

21-1101

Forest Haven defined.

Repealed.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 766, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 568, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 150(g)(1)(A)
Oct. 22, 1970, 84 Stat. 1088, Pub. L. 91-490, § 2(a)(4)
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 604(a)(5), 25 DCR 5094
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 21(e)(3), 59 DCR 5567

History

Interstate Compact on Mental Health, see § 7-1101 et seq.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 21-1101.
1973 Ed., § 21-1101.

Prior Codifications

Editor's Notes

Section 21(e)(1) of D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “Persons with Moderate Intellectual Disabilities” for “Substantially Retarded Persons” in the chapter heading.

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.